Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 38.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) The governor, through the adjutant general, shall promulgate such rules and regulations consistent with state and federal law as the governor may deem necessary for:(a) The organization, maintenance, and training of the organized militia to counter unpiloted aircraft system threats posed to the safety or security of people, critical public infrastructure, and correctional facilities, and to support state, local, tribal, and territorial law enforcement in countering these threats;(b) The detection, identification, monitoring, tracking, and mitigation of unpiloted aircraft systems; and(c) The acquisition, use, issue, and disposal of military property related to countering unpiloted aircraft system threats.(2) The governor shall have power to order the organized militia of Washington, or any part thereof, into active service of the state to support state, local, tribal, and territorial law enforcement in the detection, identification, monitoring, tracking, and mitigation of unpiloted aircraft systems that pose credible threats to people, critical public infrastructure, and correctional facilities. The organized militia ordered into active service must be trained and certified by the attorney general or the attorney general's designee, in coordination with the secretary of homeland security, through a training center that serves as the certifying authority for the national guard.--- END ---